Maryland, session 2026, HB0517.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Environment
2–104.
(a) (1) Except as provided in this [section] SUBSECTION, this title does not
limit the power of a political subdivision to adopt ordinances, rules, or regulations that set
emission standards or ambient air quality standards.
(2) A political subdivision may not adopt any ordinance, rule, or regulation
that sets an emission standard or ambient air quality standard less stringent than the
standards set by the Department under this title.
(b) [The] IN ADDITION TO THE AUTHORITY PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTION
(A) OF THIS SECTION, THE governing body of any political subdivision may ALSO ask the
Department to adopt rules and regulations that set more restrictive emission standards or
ambient air quality standards in that political subdivision.
(C) AN ORDINANCE, A RULE, OR A REGULATION ADOPTED IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO BE IN CONFLICT WITH A STANDARD
SET BY THE DEPARTMENT IF:
(1) THE LOCAL STANDARD IS AT LEAST AS STRINGENT AS THE
STANDARD SET BY THE DEPARTMENT; AND
(2) IT IS TECHNICALLY POSSIBLE FOR A REGULATED ENTITY TO
COMPLY WITH THE DEPARTMENT’S STANDARD AND THE LOCAL STANDARD.
9–502.

HOUSE BILL 517 3
(a) Unless the operation of a water supply system would interfere with a cleanup
or remediation action of the Department, this subtitle does not prohibit the installation or
operation of a water supply system that is used only to supply water for purposes other
than human or animal consumption.
(b) If a county is exempt from the provisions of this subtitle, the county may not
receive funds from the sanitary facilities fund.
(c) Any rule or regulation adopted under this subtitle does not limit or supersede
any other county, municipal, or State law, rule, or regulation that provides greater
protection to the public health, safety, or welfare.
(D) THE REQUIREMENT FOR THE DEPARTMENT TO APPROVE A COUNTY
WATER AND SEWERAGE PLAN UNDER § 9–503 OF THIS SUBTITLE DOES NOT LIMIT:
(1) THE CONTRACTING AUTHORITY OF A COUNTY; OR
(2) THE AUTHORITY OF A COUNTY TO SET EMISSION STANDARDS OR
AMBIENT AIR QUALITY STANDARDS IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–104 OF THIS ARTICLE.
9–729. RESERVED.
9–730. RESERVED.
PART IV. REFUSE DISPOSAL SYSTEMS AND SOLID WASTE REGULATION.
9–731.
(A) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN THIS PART, THIS TITLE DOES NOT LIMIT THE
POWER OF A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION TO ADOPT ANY ORDINANCE, RULE, OR
REGULATION TO REGULATE REFUSE DISPOSAL SYSTEMS OR SOLID WASTE.
(B) A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION MAY NOT ADOPT ANY ORDINANCE, RULE, OR
REGULATION TO REGULATE REFUSE DISPOSAL SYSTEMS OR SOLID WASTE IN A
MANNER THAT IS LESS STRINGENT THAN THE STANDARDS SET BY THE DEPARTMENT
UNDER THIS TITLE.
(C) AN ORDINANCE, A RULE, OR A REGULATION ADOPTED IN ACCORDANCE
WITH THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO BE IN CONFLICT WITH A STANDARD
SET BY THE DEPARTMENT IF THE LOCAL STANDARD IS AT LEAST AS STRINGENT AS
THE STANDARD SET BY THE DEPARTMENT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before October 1, 2026,

HOUSE BILL 517
the Department of the Environment shall publish information on its website recognizing
the legal authority of political subdivisions to adopt local ordinances, rules, or regulations
to ensure clean air and to regulate solid waste management within the jurisdictional
boundaries of the political subdivisions so long as the local standards are at least as
stringent as State and federal standards.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.